Colorado statutes. TITLE 11 Financial Institutions
ARTICLE 40
SAVINGS AND LOAN ASSOCIATION LAW

Cross references:

For the "Revised Uniform Unclaimed Property Act", see article 13 of title 38.

Law reviews:

For article, "Arbitrating Lender Liability

C

laims", see 18

C

olo. Law. 879 (1989).

Section

11-40-101. Short title.

Articles 40 to 46 of this title shall be known and may be cited as the "Savings and Loan Association Law".

Source:

L. 33:

p. 284, § 1.

CSA:

C. 25, § 1.

L. 51:

p. 212, § 1.

CRS 53:

§ 122-1-1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 122-1-1.

Cross references:

For additional provisions relating to savings and loan associations, see articles 47 and 48 of this title 11.

11-40-102. Definitions.

As used in articles 40 to 46 of this title, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Branch" means any office or other place of business in this state operated by an association other than its principal office in this state where subscriptions are sold, taken, or solicited for shares or stock.

"Certificate value" means the aggregate of payments by a certificate holder on shares evidenced by such certificate, plus dividends credited thereto, less withdrawals thereon.

"Commissioner" means the state commissioner of financial services.

"Division" means the division of financial services.

"Domestic savings and loan association" is one organized under the laws of Colorado and complying with the provisions thereof.

"Dues" means the periodic payments made or to be made by a member in the purchase of savings shares.

"Federal savings and loan association" means one organized or chartered under the "Home Owners' Loan Act of 1933", as may from time to time be amended, or under any federal act which may be enacted as a successor act to regulate the organization and operation of associations formerly organized or chartered under said "Home Owners' Loan Act of 1933". Federal savings and loan associations shall not be subject to the provisions of articles 40 to 46 of this title.

"Foreign savings and loan association" means an association or a holding company of an association which is organized under the laws of any other state or nation, except federal savings and loan associations which are organized under the "Home Owners' Loan Act of 1933", and any amendments thereto.

"Free share" means a share not pledged to the association by which issued as collateral security for the repayment of a loan to the owning member.

"Invested capital" means the aggregate of all certificate values, plus the aggregate par value of all permanent stock issued and paid for, if a permanent stock association.

"Loan share" means a share which has been pledged to the association by which issued as collateral security for the repayment of a loan to the owning member.

"Member" means any person owning or having control of an account with an association evidenced by certificate or passbook or any person borrowing from or assuming a loan held by an association or obligated upon a loan held by an association through purchase or otherwise, or a purchaser of property securing a loan held by an association, or a purchaser of property on a contract from an association.

(12.5) "Net worth" includes the sum of all reserve accounts, undivided profits, permanent stock, preferred stock, and surplus, the principal amount of any subordinated debt securities, and any other account or item included as net worth by regulation of the commissioner or by any law, rule, regulation, order, or decision of the federal deposit insurance corporation or its successor or any other state or federal agency that is applicable to federal savings and loan associations.

"Permanent stock" means stock which cannot be withdrawn or the value paid to the holder thereof until all liabilities of the association have been fully liquidated and paid.

"Share" means a unit having a par value of one hundred dollars evidenced by issued certificate, the certificate value of which represents the proportionate interest of a holder in the association.

"Shareholder" means the holder of shares which may be withdrawn upon due and proper notice in accordance with the bylaws or as the laws of the state may provide and the withdrawal or payment of which is not contingent upon the payment of all liabilities of the association.

"Stockholder" means a holder of permanent stock.

"Subordinated debt security" means any note, secured or otherwise, debenture, or other debt security issued by a savings and loan association which is subordinated or junior, on liquidation or otherwise, to any liability or claim of any order or rank, including all claims having the same priority as or a higher priority than savings account holders.

"Tax and loan account" means an account, the balance of which is subject to the right of immediate withdrawal, established for receipt of payments of federal taxes and certain United States' obligations. Tax and loan accounts are not shares, savings or share accounts, savings deposits, or deposit accounts.

Source:

L. 33:

p. 285, § 3.

CSA:

C. 25, § 3.

L. 39:

pp. 237, 238, §§ 1-4.

CRS 53:

§ 122-1-3.

L. 55:

p. 756, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 122-1-3.

L. 69:

p. 1013, § 2.

L. 77:

(12.5) and (17) added, p. 569, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 79:

(18) added, p. 430, § 1, effective June 19.

L. 88:

(8) amended, p. 461, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 89:

(3) and (4) amended, p. 618, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 2004:

(12.5) amended, p. 148, § 53, effective July 1.

Cross references:

For the "Home Owners' Loan Act of 1933", see Pub.L. 73-43, codified at 12 U.S.C. § 1461 et seq.

11-40-103. Savings and loan association defined.

A "savings and loan association", within the meaning of articles 40 to 46 of this title, is any domestic or foreign association or corporation formed, created, or organized to carry on the business of a savings and loan association, which is formed to encourage industry, thrift, home building, and saving among its members, by the accumulation of funds through the issuance and sale of its own shares, capital notes, or debentures, the acceptance of savings deposits, or any other manner permitted by the provisions of articles 40 to 46 of this title, the loaning or investment of the funds so accumulated to assist its members in acquiring real estate, in making improvements thereon, and in paying off existing encumbrances thereon, or for any other purposes or in any other manner permitted by the provisions of articles 40 to 46 of this title, and which accumulates funds to be returned to its members.

Source:

L. 33:

p. 284, § 2.

CSA:

C. 25, § 2.

CRS 53:

§ 122-1-2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 122-1-2.

L. 69:

p. 1013, § 1.

11-40-104. Fiscal year - closing dates - net earnings.

Each domestic savings and loan association shall have such fiscal year as may be fixed from time to time by resolution of its board of directors, but the fiscal years of all such associations shall be fixed so as to end as of the last day of a calendar month. Every domestic savings and loan association shall close its books at least once annually as of the close of business on the last day of its fiscal year and may close its books at such other time as may be fixed by resolution of its board of directors. Any reference in this section or elsewhere in articles 40 to 46 of this title to the closing date of an association means the date fixed for the closing of its books as provided in this section. The books and records of every association shall reflect all the accrued liabilities on the above dates.

The net earnings of each period ending on a closing date fixed as provided in this section shall be determined by deducting from gross income of such periods operating and nonoperating expenses and dividends and interest paid to shareholders or depositors. Expenses shall include:

Charges for estimated depreciation and obsolescence of home office building and furniture and fixtures, with contra credits to a depreciation reserve account;

Charges for all losses actually sustained during such periods from the sale of securities, real estate, or other assets or such portion of such losses as have not been charged to reserves pursuant to the provisions of section 11-42-111.

The remaining balance of gross income thus arrived at is the association's net income and shall be available for dividends on permanent stock or be credited to general reserve accounts or the undivided profits account in a manner as provided in section 11-42-111. Provision may be made for an undivided profits account not to exceed five percent of invested capital, unless an excess amount is approved by the commissioner.

No income shall be considered as earned until collected; except that interest due and unpaid may be accrued for a period of not more than six months and considered as earnings.

Source:

L. 33:

p. 356, § 12.

CSA:

C. 25, § 80.

CRS 53:

§ 122-1-4.

L. 55:

p. 756, § 2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 122-1-4.

L. 69:

p. 1014, § 3.

L. 73:

p. 1236, §§ 1, 2.

11-40-105. File annual reports.

On or before February 1 in each year, every association shall make an annual written report to the commissioner, in a form to be prescribed by the commissioner, of its affairs and operations for the twelve months ending on December 31 of the previous year.

If any association fails to file such report or if any such report is delayed or withheld beyond the day when the report should be so filed, such association shall forfeit and pay the sum of ten dollars for every day such report is withheld or delayed or not completed, and any member of any association or any party in interest may maintain an action in his or her own name to receive such penalty, and the penalty shall be paid to the state treasurer.

Every association, on or before the first day of the third calendar month after the end of its fiscal year, shall mail to each member or may, at its option, publish in a newspaper of general circulation a report in a form prescribed or approved by the commissioner of its financial condition, setting forth a statement of its assets, liabilities, and reserves in the form of a statement of condition.

Paragraph (a) of this subsection (3) shall take effect July 1, 1973, and shall apply to loans or contracts for loans entered into on or after that date. Nothing in this subsection (3) shall be deemed to affect loans or contracts for loans entered into prior to July 1, 1973.

Source:

L. 33:

p. 355, § 11.

CSA:

C. 25, § 79.

L. 39:

p. 252, § 27.

CRS 53:

§ 122-1-5.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 122-1-5.

L. 67:

p. 259, §§ 1, 2.

L. 73:

p. 1236, § 3.

L. 2000:

(1) and (2) amended, p. 155, § 2, effective August 2.

11-40-106. Annual fees and assessments - fund.

Every domestic savings and loan association operating in this state shall pay to the division of financial services such fees for administration, supervision, and examination as the commissioner may determine sufficient to meet the budget of the division of financial services as appropriated by the general assembly for the fiscal year commencing July 1. The fees shall be determined as follows:

At least semiannually, the commissioner shall assess each association, based on its total assets, to meet the costs of administration, examination, and supervision by the division for that fiscal year. Such assessments shall be calculated in terms of cents per thousand dollars of total assets but shall in no case exceed in total the costs of administration, examination, and supervision by the division for that fiscal year. The assessment calculation or ratio of the assessment charged to total assets shall be alike in all cases. On or before the dates specified by the commissioner, each association shall pay its assessment.

As of July 1 of each year, the commissioner may estimate a per diem rate to be charged for the examination of each association during the fiscal year. At the conclusion of its examination, each association shall pay the actual cost of the examination, if required by the commissioner.

At least semiannually, the commissioner shall assess each state and federal savings and loan association that has been designated as an eligible public depository, as defined in section 11-47-103 (6), based on its total public deposits held, to meet its share of the division's supervisory costs of monitoring compliance with the provisions of the "Savings and Loan Association Public Deposit Protection Act", article 47 of this title, for that fiscal year. Such assessments shall be calculated in terms of cents per thousand dollars of total public deposits held. The assessment calculation, or ratio of the assessment charged to total public deposits held, shall be alike in all cases. On or before the dates specified by the commissioner, each association shall pay its assessment.

In the same manner as specified in paragraph (b) of this subsection (1), the commissioner may charge any state or federal savings and loan association that has been designated as an eligible public depository, as defined in section 11-47-103 (6), for the actual cost of any examination necessary to assure its compliance with article 47 of this title.

All fees and collections of every kind shall be transmitted to the state treasurer, who shall credit the same to the division of financial services cash fund, which fund is hereby created in the state treasury. All moneys in the fund shall be subject to appropriation by the general assembly for the direct and indirect costs of the activities of the division of financial services. All interest derived from the deposit and investment of moneys in the fund shall be credited to the fund. Any moneys not appropriated shall remain in the fund and shall not be transferred or revert to the general fund of the state at the end of any fiscal year.

Source:

L. 33:

p. 352, § 4.

CSA:

C. 25, § 72.

L. 39:

p. 252, § 25.

L. 45:

p. 240, § 3.

L. 47:

p. 317, § 2.

CRS 53:

§ 122-1-6.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 122-1-6.

L. 67:

p. 892, § 1.

L. 81:

(1) amended, p. 619, § 1, effective April 30.

L. 83:

(1)(c) added, p. 487, § 1, effective May 10.

L. 84:

(1)(d) added, p. 377, § 1, effective May 11.

L. 88:

IP(1) and (1)(a) amended, p. 455, § 1, effective March 18.

L. 89:

IP(1) amended, p. 618, § 8, effective July 1.

L. 92:

(1)(a) and (2) amended, p. 928, § 6, effective February 25.

L. 2004:

(1)(a)(II) and (1)(a)(III) amended, p. 135, § 12, effective July 1.

L. 2005:

(1) amended, p. 14, § 1, effective February 23.

11-40-106.5. Preauthorized transfers - savings and loan association must have written authorization. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 88:

Entire section added, p. 346, § 10, effective July 1.

L. 89:

Entire section repealed, p. 592, § 1, effective April 7.

11-40-107. Defamation of associations - penalty.

Any person who willfully makes, circulates, or transmits any false statement, rumor, report, or suggestion, written, printed, or spoken, concerning the financial condition or management or assets of any savings and loan association, either by name or as a particular group of any particular city, town, or county, which incites the public or any person or creates an impression detrimental to the standing, solvency, or responsibility of said savings and loan association, or which tends to result or results in the withdrawal of funds from such association or in the exchange of shares in savings and loan associations for any other stock, bonds, notes, debentures, or other evidences of indebtedness or for any other property of any kind or character whatsoever, or which tends to result or results in impairing the confidence which may be reposed in said association and any person aiding, advising, and abetting such person in such matters and things commits a class 2 misdemeanor.

Source:

L. 33:

p. 352, § 3.

CSA:

C. 25, § 71.

CRS 53:

§ 122-1-7.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 122-1-7.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3150, § 122, effective March 1, 2022.

Cross references:

For the penalty for a class 2 misdemeanor, see § 18-1.3-501.

11-40-108. Circulating false information - penalty.

Any person who willfully and knowingly concurs in or is responsible, directly or indirectly, for the making, publishing, or posting, either generally or privately, to actual or prospective members or investors of any false or misleading information tending to imply that any other business operated in this state is a savings and loan association or operated in the manner of a savings and loan association or is regulated in whole or in part under the provisions of articles 40 to 46 of this title 11 commits a class 2 misdemeanor.

Source:

L. 33:

p. 359, § 17.

CSA:

C. 25, § 85.

CRS 53:

§ 122-1-8.

L. 63:

p. 292, § 12.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 122-1-8.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3150, § 123, effective March 1, 2022.

Cross references:

For the penalty for a class 2 misdemeanor, see § 18-1.3-501.

11-40-109. Suits interfering with business of association.

No order, judgment, or decree providing for an accounting of, or enjoining, restraining, or interfering with the transaction of, the business of any savings and loan association organized or doing business under the provisions of articles 40 to 46 of this title shall be made or granted otherwise than upon the application of the attorney general, after his or her approval of a written request therefor by the commissioner, except in an action by a judgment creditor or in proceedings supplementary to execution.

Source:

L. 33:

p. 358, § 14.

CSA:

C. 25, § 82.

CRS 53:

§ 122-1-9.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 122-1-9.

L. 2016:

Entire section amended, (HB 16-1094), ch. 94, p. 265, § 6, effective August 10.